fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Équitation > Harnachement: Bricoles et martingales; Mors; Brides; Sous-ventrière; Sangles; Paniers de pâturage et colliers anti-tique; Licous pour chevaux; Harnais pour chevaux; Rênes pour chevaux; Rênes; Lassos et équipement de roping; Selles; Étriers
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Jazdectvo > Jazdecké potreby: Náprsné chrániče a martingaly; Zubadlá; Uzdy; Podbrušníky; Popruhy; Náhubky pre kone na pasenie a proti okusovaniu ohrady; Ohlávky pre kone; Konské postroje; Vôdzky pre kone; Opraty; Laná a lanové vybavenie; Sedlá; Strmene
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Конен спорт > Конски сбруи: Нагръдници и мартингали; Удила; Юзди; Опаси; Подпруги; Намордници за ограничаване на паша и вредни навици при коне; Оглавници; Пълен комплект амуниция за коне; Поводи за водене на коне; Поводи; Въжета и въжено оборудване; Седла; Стремена
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Jahanje > Oprema za konje: Prsni pasovi in martingali; Brzde; Vajeti; Podsedelni pasovi; Podsedelni pas; Nagobčniki za pašo in preprečevanje grizenja; Oglavke za konje; Vrvi za konje; Povodci za konje; Vajeti; Vrvi in oprema za lasso; Sedla; Stremena
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Hästsport > Ridtyg: Förbyglar och martingaler; Tränsbett; Tränsar; Sadelgjordar; Sadelgjordar; Betesreducerare och krubbitarremmar; Grimmor för hästar; Hästselar; Ledrep för hästar; Tyglar; Rep och lassoutrustning; Sadlar; Stigbyglar
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Echitație > Harnașamente: Pieptare și martingale; Elemente căpăstru; Căpestre; Curele; Chingi; Botniță pentru pășunat și ros la cai; Opritori pentru cai; Hamuri pentru cai; Funii pentru cai; Frâie; Frânghii și echipament pentru lasou; Șei; Scări
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Jezdectví > Jezdecké potřeby pro koně: Poprsníky a martingaly; Udidla; Uzdy a uzdečky; Sedlové řemeny; Podbřišníky; Pastevní košíky a řemeny proti klkání; Koňské ohlávky; Postroje; Vodítka pro koně; Otěže; Lasa a vybavení pro roping; Sedla; Třmeny
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > การขี่ม้า > แท็คสำหรับม้า: สายรัดอกและสายรัดประคองหัวม้า; เหล็กปากม้า; บังเหียน; สายคาดอานม้า; สายรัดทึบท้องม้า; ตะกร้อครอบปากม้ากันกินหญ้าและแทะคอก; ขลุมจูง; บังเหียนม้า; เชือกจูงม้า; สายบังเหียน; เชือกและอุปกรณ์คล้องม้า; อานม้า; โกลน
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Jeździectwo > Rząd koński: Napierśniki i wytoki; Wędzidła; Uzdy; Popręgi; Popręgi; Kagańce na pastwisko i przeciw łykaniu; Kantary dla koni; Uprzęże jeździeckie; Uwiązy dla koni; Lejce; Lassa i sprzęt ropingowy; Siodła; Strzemiona
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Lovaglás > Lófelszerelés: Szügyelők és martingálok; Kantárbitek; Kantárok; Fűzők; Hevederek; Legelő- és karórágó szájkosarak lovaknak; Lókötők; Lóhámok; Lóvezetők; Kantárkötelek; Kötelek és lasszózási felszerelések; Nyergek; Kengyelek
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Cưỡi ngựa > Đinh thúc ngựa: Đai ngực & dây cố định đầu ngựa; Hàm thiếc ngựa; Bộ cương ngựa; Đai; Đai nịt yên ngựa; Rọ mõm chống cắn & ăn cỏ cho ngựa; Dây cương; Bộ yên cương ngựa; Dây dắt ngựa; Dây cương ngựa; Thiết bị thòng lọng & dây thừng; Yên ngựa; Bàn đạp
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 馬術運動 > 馬術裝備: 胸帶與低頭革; 馬銜; 馬轡; 馬鞍束帶; 肚帶; 馬匹食草與防啃咬嘴套; 馬籠頭; 馬具; 馬牽繩; 韁繩; 繩索與套索設備; 鞍; 鐙
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > 乗馬 > 馬具: 胸がい・マルチンゲール; ハミ; 頭絡; 鞍帯; 腹帯; 馬用放牧・さく癖防止口かご; 馬用ホルター; 馬車ハーネス; 馬用リードロープ; 手綱; ロープ・投げ縄用品; 鞍; 鐙
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Reitsportzubehör > Sattel- & Zaumzeug: Vorderzeuge & Martingale; Trensen; Zaumzeug; Sattelgurte; Sattelgurte; Fress- & Kopperbremsen für Pferde; Halfter; Pferdegeschirr; Pferdeleinen; Zügel; Roping-Seile & Zubehör; Sättel; Steigbügel
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 马术用品 > 马具: 胸饰和副缰; 马口衔铁/马嚼子; 马笼套; 马肚带; 肚带; 马匹啃咬和防吃口套; 马缰; 马挽具; 牵马绳; 缰绳; 套索和绳索设备; 鞍; 马镫
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Ιππασία > Εξοπλισμός αλόγου: Επιστήθια & μαρτινγκάλ; Στόμια χαλινού; Χαλινοί; Ζώνες σέλας; Έπαχα; Φίμωτρα βόσκησης & αποτροπής αεροσυνοδείας αλόγου; Χαλινάρια αλόγου; Ζυγοί για άλογα; Οδηγοί για άλογα; Ηνία; Σχοινιά & εξοπλισμός λάσο (Roping); Σέλες; Αναβολείς
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 승마 > 마구용품: 브레스트플레이트 및 마틴게일; 재갈; 말굴레; 뱃대끈; 거스; 말 방목 및 씹기 방지 입마개; 말 고삐; 마구; 말 리드; 고삐; 로프 및 로핑 장비; 안장; 등자
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Equestre > Equipamentos para cavalos: Peitorais e gamarras; Bridões; Cabeções; Cilhas; Cilhas; Açaimes de pasto e contra a aerofagia; Cabrestos para cavalos; Arneses para cavalos; Guias de trabalho para cavalos; Rédeas; Cordas e equipamento de laço; Selas; Estribos
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Конный спорт > Сбруя и седла: Подперсья и мартингалы; Удила; Уздечки; Подпруги; Подпруги; Намордники для выпаса и от прикуски; Недоуздки для лошадей; Упряжь для лошадей; Чомбуры для лошадей; Поводья; Лассо и снаряжение для роупинга; Седла; Стремена
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Binicilik > Nal Çivileri: Göğüslükler ve martingaleler; Gemler; Yularlar; At Kolanları; Kolanlar; At otlama ve hava yutma ağızlıkları; At Yularları; At Koşum Takımları; At Yular Kayışları; Dizginler; Halatlar ve kement ekipmanları; Eyerler; Üzengiler
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Equestrian > Horse Tack: Breastplates & Martingales; Bridle Bits; Bridles; Cinches; Girths; Horse Grazing & Cribbing Muzzles; Horse Halters; Horse Harnesses; Horse Leads; Reins; Ropes & Roping Equipment; Saddles; Stirrups
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Jahanje > Oprema za konje: Prsni oklopi i martingali; Žvale na uzdu; Uzda; Kolan za jahanje; Kolani; Brnjice za ispašu i gutilice za konja; Ulari; Orme za konje; Vodilice za konje; Uzde za držanje; Užad i oprema za užad; Sedla; Stremeni
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Dressur > Hesteudstyr: Fortøj og martingaler; Bidsler; Hovedtøj; Sadelgjorde; Gjorde; Mundkurve og græsmasker til heste; Grimer; Seletøj til heste; Træktov; Hestetømmer; Reb og lassoer; Sadler; Stigbøjler
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Paardensport > Paardentuig: Borsttuigen en martingalen; Paardenbitten; Hoofdstellen; Zadelriemen; Singels; Graasmaskers en kribbebijtbanden voor paarden; Paardenhalsters; Paardenharnassen; Paardenlijnen; Teugels; Touwen en lasso-uitrusting; Zadels; Stijgbeugels
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Hestesport > Hesteutstyr: Fortøy og martingaler; Bitt; Hodelag; Gjorder; Gjorder; Gress- og krybbebitermasker for hest; Grimer; Seletøy; Hestetøyler; Tøyler; Tau og lassoutstyr; Saler; Stigbøyler
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Equitazione > Finimenti per cavalli: Pettorali e martingalle; Morsi da equitazione; Briglie; Sottopancia; Sottopancia; Museruole da pascolo e antiticchio per cavalli; Cavezze per cavalli; Briglie da equitazione; Lunghine per cavalli; Redini; Corde e attrezzatura da roping; Selle; Staffe
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Equitación > Arreos para caballos: Petrales y martingalas; Bocados para caballos; Cabezadas; Cinchas; Cinchas; Bozales de pastoreo y anti-aerofagia para caballos; Cabestros para caballos; Arneses para caballos; Cuerdas para caballos; Riendas; Cuerdas y equipos de lazo; Monturas; Estribos
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Ratsastus > Ratsastusvälineet: Rintaremmit ja martingaalit; Kuolaimet; Suitset; Lännensatulat; Satulavyöt; Laidun- ja imppauskopat; Hevosen riimut; Hevosen valjaat; Riimunarut; Ohjat; Köydet ja lassotarvikkeet; Satulat; Jalustimet
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Jojimo sportas > Žirgų inventorius: Krūtinės diržai ir martingalai; Žąslai; Kamanos; Pavaržos; Pilvo diržai; Arklio ganymo ir kandžiojimosi antsnukiai; Kantarai; Pakinktai; Žirgų vedimo virvės; Pavadžiai; Virvės ir lazo įranga; Balnai; Balnakilpės
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Esportes equestres > Equipamentos para cavalos: Peitorais e martingais; Freios para cavalos; Bridas; Cilhas para cavalos; Cilhas e barrigueiras; Focinheiras de pastejo e antiaerofagia; Cabrestos para cavalos; Arreios para cavalos; Cordas e correias para cavalos; Rédeas para cavalos; Cordas e equipamentos de laço; Selas; Estribos